Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.351

Enjoinder from doing business in this state.

A foreign limited liability company may be enjoined from doing business in this state under RCW 23.95.555.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7123; 2015 c 188 s 69.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.